Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.040

Rejection of ballots or parts—Write-in votes.

A ballot is invalid and no votes on that ballot may be counted if it is found folded together with another ballot.

Those parts of a ballot are invalid and no votes may be counted for those issues or offices where more votes are cast for the office or issue than are permitted by law; write-in votes do not contain all of the information required under RCW 29A.60.021; or that issue or office is not marked with sufficient definiteness to determine the voter's choice or intention. No write-in vote may be rejected due to a variation in the form of the name if the canvassing board can determine the issue for or against which or the person and the office for which the voter intended to vote.

[ 2011 c 10 s 47; 2009 c 414 s 2; 2003 c 111 s 1504. Prior: 1999 c 158 s 13; 1999 c 157 s 4; 1990 c 59 s 56; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 88; 1973 1st ex.s. c 121 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 101 s 11; 1965 c 9 s 29.54.050; prior: (i) Code 1881 s 3091; 1865 p 38 s 2; RRS s 5336. (ii) 1895 c 156 s 10; 1889 p 411 s 29; RRS s 5294. (iii) 1905 c 39 s 1, part; 1889 p 405 s 15, part; RRS s 5272, part. (iv) 1895 c 156 s 11, part; 1886 p 128 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 3079, part; 1865 p 34 s 4, part; RRS s 5323, part. Formerly RCW 29.54.050.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.